New York, session 2025-2026, A369.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (c) of section 304-a of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as added by chapter 61 of the laws of 1989, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (c) The commissioner may, by regulation, establish standards of compe- 5 tency and fitness for certification as an inspector. If an individual 6 meets any standards of competency and fitness established by the commis- 7 sioner, the applicant shall not be precluded from receiving a certif- 8 icate so long as the applicant pays any fees required herein. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD01883-01-5